Hawaii, session 2026, SB3063.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-1317, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§302A-1317[]]  Local edible produce and packaged food products procurement; small purchases.  Notwithstanding section 103D-305(c) and any other law to the contrary, procurements of [less]: (1)  Less than $250,000 for local edible produce and packaged food products for the department; or (2)  Any amount for local edible produce and packaged food products for the department that cost not more than five per cent more than non-local alternatives, shall be exempt from the requirement to conduct procurements through an electronic system and shall instead be subject to [no less] not fewer than three written quotes; provided that if the department is unable to receive the required number of written notifications as required by this section, written justification shall be provided and kept by the department. For the purposes of this section, "non-local alternatives" means food products that do not meet the definitions of "fresh local agricultural products" or "local value-added, processed, agricultural, or food products" as defined in section 27-8." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.